Maryland, session 2026, HB0418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–101.
(a) In this title the following words or terms have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Circuit court” means the circuit court for a county.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0418*

HOUSE BILL 418
(c) “Court” means the Supreme Court of Maryland, Appellate Court of Maryland,
circuit court, and District Court of Maryland, or any of them, unless the context clearly
requires a contrary meaning. It does not include an orphans’ court, or the Maryland Tax
Court.
(d) “Judge” means a judge of a court.
1–206.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) EACH COURT SHALL PROVIDE REMOTE PUBLIC ACCESS FOR BAIL
REVIEW HEARINGS, UNLESS A HEARING IS DEEMED CLOSED, CONFIDENTIAL, OR
RESTRICTED BY FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
(C) UNLESS THERE IS AN OVERRIDING PUBLIC INTEREST COMPELLING
DISCLOSURE, A PRESIDING JUDGE MAY PROHIBIT THE BROADCAST OF ANY PORTION
OF A HEARING ON THE REQUEST OF ANY PARTY, WITNESS, OR COUNSEL INVOLVED
IN THE HEARING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.